Illinois, session 104th, SB1908.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 5Sections 50-10, 65-35, 65-40, and 65-43 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/50-10)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-10)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 50-10. Definitions. Each of the following terms, when 9used in this Act, shall have the meaning ascribed to it in this 10Section, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:11    "Academic year" means the customary annual schedule of 12courses at a college, university, or approved school, 13customarily regarded as the school year as distinguished from 14the calendar year.15    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 16by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 17file or license file as maintained by the Department's 18licensure maintenance unit.19    "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a 20person who has met the qualifications for a (i) certified 21nurse midwife (CNM); (ii) certified nurse practitioner (CNP); 22(iii) certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA); or (iv) 23clinical nurse specialist (CNS) and has been licensed by the   SB1908- 2 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1Department. All advanced practice registered nurses licensed 2and practicing in the State of Illinois shall use the title 3APRN and may use specialty credentials CNM, CNP, CRNA, or CNS 4after their name. All advanced practice registered nurses may 5only practice in accordance with national certification and 6this Act. 7    "Advisory Board" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce 8Center Advisory Board.9    "Approved program of professional nursing education" and 10"approved program of practical nursing education" are programs 11of professional or practical nursing, respectively, approved 12by the Department under the provisions of this Act.13    "Board" means the Board of Nursing appointed by the 14Secretary.15    "Center" means the Illinois Nursing Workforce Center.16    "Collaboration" means a process involving 2 or more health 17care professionals working together, each contributing one's 18respective area of expertise to provide more comprehensive 19patient care.20    "Competence" means an expected and measurable level of 21performance that integrates knowledge, skills, abilities, and 22judgment based on established scientific knowledge and 23expectations for nursing practice. 24    "Comprehensive nursing assessment" means the gathering of 25information about the patient's physiological, psychological, 26sociological, and spiritual status on an ongoing basis by a   SB1908- 3 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1registered professional nurse and is the first step in 2implementing and guiding the nursing plan of care. 3    "Consultation" means the process whereby an advanced 4practice registered nurse seeks the advice or opinion of 5another health care professional.6    "Credentialed" means the process of assessing and 7validating the qualifications of a health care professional.8    "Dentist" means a person licensed to practice dentistry 9under the Illinois Dental Practice Act.10    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 11Professional Regulation.12    "Email address of record" means the designated email 13address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 14application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 15by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.16    "Focused nursing assessment" means an appraisal of an 17individual's status and current situation, contributing to the 18comprehensive nursing assessment performed by the registered 19professional nurse or advanced practice registered nurse or 20the assessment by the physician assistant, physician, dentist, 21podiatric physician, or other licensed health care 22professional, as determined by the Department, supporting 23ongoing data collection, and deciding who needs to be informed 24of the information and when to inform. 25    "Full practice authority" means the authority of an 26advanced practice registered nurse licensed in Illinois and   SB1908- 4 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1certified as a nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, 2or nurse midwife to practice without a written collaborative 3agreement and: 4        (1) to be fully accountable to patients for the 5    quality of advanced nursing care rendered; 6        (2) to be fully accountable for recognizing limits of 7    knowledge and experience and for planning for the 8    management of situations beyond the advanced practice 9    registered nurse's expertise; the full practice authority 10    for advanced practice registered nurses includes accepting 11    referrals from, consulting with, collaborating with, or 12    referring to other health care professionals as warranted 13    by the needs of the patient; and 14        (3) to possess the authority to prescribe medications, 15    including Schedule II through V controlled substances, as 16    provided in Section 65-43. 17    "Full practice authority-pending advanced practice 18registered nurse" means an advanced practice registered nurse 19licensed in Illinois and certified as a nurse practitioner, 20clinical nurse specialist, or nurse midwife who has provided a 21notarized attestation of completion of at least 250 hours of 22continuing education or training in the advanced practice 23registered nurse's area of certification and at least 4,000 24hours of clinical experience after first attaining national 25certification and who has submitted an application to the 26Department to be granted full practice authority.   SB1908- 5 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1    "Hospital affiliate" means a corporation, partnership, 2joint venture, limited liability company, or similar 3organization, other than a hospital, that is devoted primarily 4to the provision, management, or support of health care 5services and that directly or indirectly controls, is 6controlled by, or is under common control of the hospital. For 7the purposes of this definition, "control" means having at 8least an equal or a majority ownership or membership interest. 9A hospital affiliate shall be 100% owned or controlled by any 10combination of hospitals, their parent corporations, or 11physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 12in Illinois. "Hospital affiliate" does not include a health 13maintenance organization regulated under the Health 14Maintenance Organization Act. 15    "Impaired nurse" means a nurse licensed under this Act who 16is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety because 17of a physical or mental disability as evidenced by a written 18determination or written consent based on clinical evidence, 19including loss of motor skills, abuse of drugs or alcohol, or a 20psychiatric disorder, of sufficient degree to diminish his or 21her ability to deliver competent patient care.22    "License-pending advanced practice registered nurse" means 23a registered professional nurse who has completed all 24requirements for licensure as an advanced practice registered 25nurse except the certification examination and has applied to 26take the next available certification exam and received a   SB1908- 6 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1temporary permit from the Department.2    "License-pending registered nurse" means a person who has 3passed the Department-approved registered nurse licensure exam 4and has applied for a license from the Department. A 5license-pending registered nurse shall use the title "RN lic 6pend" on all documentation related to nursing practice.7    "Nursing intervention" means any treatment based on 8clinical nursing judgment or knowledge that a nurse performs. 9An individual or entity shall not mandate that a registered 10professional nurse delegate nursing interventions if the 11registered professional nurse determines it is inappropriate 12to do so. A nurse shall not be subject to disciplinary or any 13other adverse action for refusing to delegate a nursing 14intervention based on patient safety. 15    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 16in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.17    "Podiatric physician" means a person licensed to practice 18podiatry under the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987. 19    "Practical nurse" or "licensed practical nurse" means a 20person who is licensed as a practical nurse under this Act and 21practices practical nursing as defined in this Act. Only a 22practical nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use the 23title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation 24"L.P.N.".25    "Practical nursing" means the performance of nursing 26interventions requiring the nursing knowledge, judgment, and   SB1908- 7 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1skill acquired by means of completion of an approved practical 2nursing education program. Practical nursing includes 3assisting in the nursing process under the guidance of a 4registered professional nurse or an advanced practice 5registered nurse. The practical nurse may work under the 6direction of a licensed physician, dentist, podiatric 7physician, or other health care professional determined by the 8Department.9    "Privileged" means the authorization granted by the 10governing body of a healthcare facility, agency, or 11organization to provide specific patient care services within 12well-defined limits, based on qualifications reviewed in the 13credentialing process. 14    "Registered Nurse" or "Registered Professional Nurse" 15means a person who is licensed as a professional nurse under 16this Act and practices nursing as defined in this Act. Only a 17registered nurse licensed under this Act is entitled to use 18the titles "registered nurse" and "registered professional 19nurse" and the abbreviation, "R.N.".20    "Registered professional nursing practice" means a 21scientific process founded on a professional body of knowledge 22that includes, but is not limited to, the protection, 23promotion, and optimization of health and abilities, 24prevention of illness and injury, development and 25implementation of the nursing plan of care, facilitation of 26nursing interventions to alleviate suffering, care   SB1908- 8 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1coordination, and advocacy in the care of individuals, 2families, groups, communities, and populations. "Registered 3professional nursing practice" does not include the act of 4medical diagnosis or prescription of medical therapeutic or 5corrective measures.6    "Professional assistance program for nurses" means a 7professional assistance program that meets criteria 8established by the Board of Nursing and approved by the 9Secretary, which provides a non-disciplinary treatment 10approach for nurses licensed under this Act whose ability to 11practice is compromised by alcohol or chemical substance 12addiction.13    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 14Professional Regulation.15    "Unencumbered license" means a license issued in good 16standing.17    "Written collaborative agreement" means a written 18agreement between an advanced practice registered nurse and a 19collaborating physician, dentist, certified nurse midwife with 20full practice authority, or podiatric physician pursuant to 21Section 65-35. 22(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-686, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    (225 ILCS 65/65-35)  (was 225 ILCS 65/15-15)24    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)25    Sec. 65-35. Written collaborative agreements.  SB1908- 9 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1    (a) A written collaborative agreement is required for all 2advanced practice registered nurses engaged in clinical 3practice prior to meeting the requirements of Section 65-43, 4except for advanced practice registered nurses who are 5privileged to practice in a hospital, hospital affiliate, or 6ambulatory surgical treatment center.7    (a-5) If an advanced practice registered nurse engages in 8clinical practice outside of a hospital, hospital affiliate, 9or ambulatory surgical treatment center in which he or she is 10privileged to practice, the advanced practice registered nurse 11must have a written collaborative agreement, except as set 12forth in Section 65-43.13    (b) A written collaborative agreement shall describe the 14relationship of the advanced practice registered nurse with 15the collaborating physician or certified nurse midwife with 16full practice authority and shall describe the categories of 17care, treatment, or procedures to be provided by the advanced 18practice registered nurse. A collaborative agreement with a 19podiatric physician must be in accordance with subsection 20(c-5) or (c-15) of this Section. A collaborative agreement 21with a dentist must be in accordance with subsection (c-10) of 22this Section. A collaborative agreement with a podiatric 23physician must be in accordance with subsection (c-5) of this 24Section. A collaborative agreement between an advanced 25practice registered nurse certified as a certified nurse 26midwife and a certified nurse midwife with full practice   SB1908- 10 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1authority must be in accordance with subsection (c-20) of this 2Section. Collaboration does not require an employment 3relationship between the collaborating physician or certified 4nurse midwife with full practice authority and the advanced 5practice registered nurse.6    The collaborative relationship under an agreement shall 7not be construed to require the personal presence of a 8collaborating physician or certified nurse midwife with full 9practice authority at the place where services are rendered. 10Methods of communication shall be available for consultation 11with the collaborating physician or certified nurse midwife 12with full practice authority in person or by 13telecommunications or electronic communications as set forth 14in the written agreement.15    (b-5) Absent an employment relationship, a written 16collaborative agreement may not (1) restrict the categories of 17patients of an advanced practice registered nurse within the 18scope of the advanced practice registered nurses training and 19experience, (2) limit third party payors or government health 20programs, such as the medical assistance program or Medicare 21with which the advanced practice registered nurse contracts, 22or (3) limit the geographic area or practice location of the 23advanced practice registered nurse in this State.24    (c) In the case of anesthesia services provided by a 25certified registered nurse anesthetist, an anesthesiologist, a 26physician, a dentist, or a podiatric physician must   SB1908- 11 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1participate through discussion of and agreement with the 2anesthesia plan and remain physically present and available on 3the premises during the delivery of anesthesia services for 4diagnosis, consultation, and treatment of emergency medical 5conditions. 6    (c-5) A certified registered nurse anesthetist, who 7provides anesthesia services outside of a hospital or 8ambulatory surgical treatment center shall enter into a 9written collaborative agreement with an anesthesiologist or 10the physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 11branches or the podiatric physician performing the procedure. 12Outside of a hospital or ambulatory surgical treatment center, 13the certified registered nurse anesthetist may provide only 14those services that the collaborating podiatric physician is 15authorized to provide pursuant to the Podiatric Medical 16Practice Act of 1987 and rules adopted thereunder. A certified 17registered nurse anesthetist may select, order, and administer 18medication, including controlled substances, and apply 19appropriate medical devices for delivery of anesthesia 20services under the anesthesia plan agreed with by the 21anesthesiologist or the operating physician or operating 22podiatric physician.23    (c-10) A certified registered nurse anesthetist who 24provides anesthesia services in a dental office shall enter 25into a written collaborative agreement with an 26anesthesiologist or the physician licensed to practice   SB1908- 12 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1medicine in all its branches or the operating dentist 2performing the procedure. The agreement shall describe the 3working relationship of the certified registered nurse 4anesthetist and dentist and shall authorize the categories of 5care, treatment, or procedures to be performed by the 6certified registered nurse anesthetist. In a collaborating 7dentist's office, the certified registered nurse anesthetist 8may only provide those services that the operating dentist 9with the appropriate permit is authorized to provide pursuant 10to the Illinois Dental Practice Act and rules adopted 11thereunder. For anesthesia services, an anesthesiologist, 12physician, or operating dentist shall participate through 13discussion of and agreement with the anesthesia plan and shall 14remain physically present and be available on the premises 15during the delivery of anesthesia services for diagnosis, 16consultation, and treatment of emergency medical conditions. A 17certified registered nurse anesthetist may select, order, and 18administer medication, including controlled substances, and 19apply appropriate medical devices for delivery of anesthesia 20services under the anesthesia plan agreed with by the 21operating dentist.22    (c-15) An advanced practice registered nurse who had a 23written collaborative agreement with a podiatric physician 24immediately before the effective date of Public Act 100-513 25may continue in that collaborative relationship or enter into 26a new written collaborative relationship with a podiatric   SB1908- 13 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1physician under the requirements of this Section and Section 265-40, as those Sections existed immediately before the 3amendment of those Sections by Public Act 100-513 with regard 4to a written collaborative agreement between an advanced 5practice registered nurse and a podiatric physician. 6    (c-20) An advanced practice registered nurse certified as 7a certified nurse midwife may enter into a written 8collaborative agreement with a certified nurse midwife with 9full practice authority or a physician. 10    (d) A copy of the signed, written collaborative agreement 11must be available to the Department upon request from both the 12advanced practice registered nurse and the collaborating 13physician, dentist, certified nurse midwife with full practice 14authority, or podiatric physician. 15    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 16delegation of tasks or duties by a physician to a licensed 17practical nurse, a registered professional nurse, or other 18persons in accordance with Section 54.2 of the Medical 19Practice Act of 1987. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to 20limit the method of delegation that may be authorized by any 21means, including, but not limited to, oral, written, 22electronic, standing orders, protocols, guidelines, or verbal 23orders. 24    (e-5) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to authorize 25an advanced practice registered nurse to provide health care 26services required by law or rule to be performed by a   SB1908- 14 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1physician. The scope of practice of an advanced practice 2registered nurse does not include operative surgery. Nothing 3in this Section shall be construed to preclude an advanced 4practice registered nurse from assisting in surgery. 5    (f) An advanced practice registered nurse shall inform 6each collaborating physician, dentist, certified nurse midwife 7with full practice authority, or podiatric physician of all 8collaborative agreements he or she has signed and provide a 9copy of these to any collaborating physician, dentist, 10certified nurse midwife with full practice authority, or 11podiatric physician upon request.12    (g) (Blank).13(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18; 100-577, eff. 1-26-18; 14100-1096, eff. 8-26-18; 101-13, eff. 6-12-19.) 15    (225 ILCS 65/65-40)  (was 225 ILCS 65/15-20)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)17    Sec. 65-40. Written collaborative agreement; prescriptive 18authority. 19    (a) A collaborating physician or certified nurse midwife 20with full practice authority may, but is not required to, 21delegate prescriptive authority to an advanced practice 22registered nurse as part of a written collaborative agreement. 23This authority may, but is not required to, include 24prescription of, selection of, orders for, administration of, 25storage of, acceptance of samples of, and dispensing over the   SB1908- 15 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1counter medications, legend drugs, medical gases, and 2controlled substances categorized as any Schedule III through 3V controlled substances, as defined in Article II of the 4Illinois Controlled Substances Act, and other preparations, 5including, but not limited to, botanical and herbal remedies. 6The collaborating physician must have a valid current Illinois 7controlled substance license and federal registration to 8delegate authority to prescribe delegated controlled 9substances.10    (b) To prescribe controlled substances under this Section, 11an advanced practice registered nurse must obtain a mid-level 12practitioner controlled substance license. Medication orders 13shall be reviewed periodically by the collaborating physician.14    (c) The collaborating physician or certified nurse midwife 15with full practice authority shall file with the Department 16and the Prescription Monitoring Program notice of delegation 17of prescriptive authority and termination of such delegation, 18in accordance with rules of the Department. Upon receipt of 19this notice delegating authority to prescribe any Schedule III 20through V controlled substances, the licensed advanced 21practice registered nurse shall be eligible to register for a 22mid-level practitioner controlled substance license under 23Section 303.05 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act.24    (d) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), 25(b), and (c) of this Section, a collaborating physician or 26certified nurse midwife with full practice authority may, but   SB1908- 16 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1is not required to, delegate authority to an advanced practice 2registered nurse to prescribe any Schedule II controlled 3substances, if all of the following conditions apply:4        (1) Specific Schedule II controlled substances by oral 5    dosage or topical or transdermal application may be 6    delegated, provided that the delegated Schedule II 7    controlled substances are routinely prescribed by the 8    collaborating physician or certified nurse midwife with 9    full practice authority. This delegation must identify the 10    specific Schedule II controlled substances by either brand 11    name or generic name. Schedule II controlled substances to 12    be delivered by injection or other route of administration 13    may not be delegated. 14        (2) Any delegation must be controlled substances that 15    the collaborating physician or certified nurse midwife 16    with full practice authority prescribes.17        (3) Any prescription must be limited to no more than a 18    30-day supply, with any continuation authorized only after 19    prior approval of the collaborating physician or certified 20    nurse midwife with full practice authority.21        (4) The advanced practice registered nurse must 22    discuss the condition of any patients for whom a 23    controlled substance is prescribed monthly with the 24    delegating physician or certified nurse midwife with full 25    practice authority.26        (5) The advanced practice registered nurse meets the   SB1908- 17 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1    education requirements of Section 303.05 of the Illinois 2    Controlled Substances Act. 3    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 4delegation of tasks or duties by a physician to a licensed 5practical nurse, a registered professional nurse, or other 6persons. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 7method of delegation that may be authorized by any means, 8including, but not limited to, oral, written, electronic, 9standing orders, protocols, guidelines, or verbal orders. 10    (f) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to apply to 11any medication authority including Schedule II controlled 12substances of an advanced practice registered nurse for care 13provided in a hospital, hospital affiliate, or ambulatory 14surgical treatment center pursuant to Section 65-45. 15    (g) (Blank). 16    (h) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit 17generic substitution. 18    (i) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to apply to 19an advanced practice registered nurse who meets the 20requirements of Section 65-43. 21(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 22    (225 ILCS 65/65-43)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)24    Sec. 65-43. Full practice authority.25    (a) An Illinois-licensed advanced practice registered   SB1908- 18 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1nurse certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or 2clinical nurse specialist shall be deemed by law to possess 3the ability to practice without a written collaborative 4agreement as set forth in this Section.5    (b) An advanced practice registered nurse certified as a 6nurse midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or nurse 7practitioner who files with the Department a notarized 8attestation of completion of at least 250 hours of continuing 9education or training and at least 4,000 hours of clinical 10experience after first attaining national certification shall 11not require a written collaborative agreement. Documentation 12of successful completion shall be provided to the Department 13upon request. 14    Continuing education or training hours required by 15subsection (b) shall be in the advanced practice registered 16nurse's area of certification as set forth by Department rule.17    The clinical experience must be in the advanced practice 18registered nurse's area of certification. The clinical 19experience shall be in collaboration with a physician or 20physicians. For an advanced practice registered nurse 21certified as a nurse midwife, the clinical experience shall be 22in collaboration with a certified nurse midwife with full 23practice authority. Completion of the clinical experience must 24be attested to by the collaborating physician or physicians, 25collaborating certified nurse midwife with full practice 26authority, or employer and the advanced practice registered   SB1908- 19 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1nurse. If the collaborating physician or physicians, 2collaborating certified nurse midwife with full practice 3authority, or employer is unable to attest to the completion 4of the clinical experience, the Department may accept other 5evidence of clinical experience as established by rule. 6    (c) The scope of practice of an advanced practice 7registered nurse with full practice authority includes:8        (1) all matters included in subsection (c) of Section 9    65-30 of this Act;10        (2) practicing without a written collaborative 11    agreement in all practice settings consistent with 12    national certification, except in the case of an advanced 13    practice registered nurse with full practice authority who 14    is certified as a nurse midwife, who may enter into a 15    written collaborative agreement with a licensed certified 16    nurse midwife pursuant to Section 65-35;17        (3) authority to prescribe both legend drugs and 18    Schedule II through V controlled substances; this 19    authority includes prescription of, selection of, orders 20    for, administration of, storage of, acceptance of samples 21    of, and dispensing over the counter medications, legend 22    drugs, and controlled substances categorized as any 23    Schedule II through V controlled substances, as defined in 24    Article II of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, and 25    other preparations, including, but not limited to, 26    botanical and herbal remedies;  SB1908- 20 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1        (4) prescribing Schedule II narcotic drugs, such as 2    opioids, only in a consultation relationship with a 3    physician; this consultation relationship shall be 4    recorded in the Prescription Monitoring Program website, 5    pursuant to Section 316 of the Illinois Controlled 6    Substances Act, by the physician and advanced practice 7    registered nurse with full practice authority and is not 8    required to be filed with the Department; the specific 9    Schedule II narcotic drug must be identified by either 10    brand name or generic name; the specific Schedule II 11    narcotic drug, such as an opioid, may be administered by 12    oral dosage or topical or transdermal application; 13    delivery by injection or other route of administration is 14    not permitted; at least monthly, the advanced practice 15    registered nurse and the physician must discuss the 16    condition of any patients for whom an opioid is 17    prescribed; nothing in this subsection shall be construed 18    to require a prescription by an advanced practice 19    registered nurse with full practice authority to require a 20    physician name;21        (4.5) prescribing up to a 120-day supply of 22    benzodiazepines without a consultation relationship with a 23    physician; thereafter, continued prescription of 24    benzodiazepines shall require a consultation with a 25    physician; nothing in this subsection shall be construed 26    to require a prescription by an advanced practice   SB1908- 21 -LRB104 08797 AAS 18852 b1    registered nurse with full practice authority to require a 2    physician name; 3        (5) authority to obtain an Illinois controlled 4    substance license and a federal Drug Enforcement 5    Administration number; and6        (6) use of only local anesthetic.7    The scope of practice of an advanced practice registered 8nurse does not include operative surgery. Nothing in this 9Section shall be construed to preclude an advanced practice 10registered nurse from assisting in surgery. 11    (d) The Department may adopt rules necessary to administer 12this Section, including, but not limited to, requiring the 13completion of forms and the payment of fees.14    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to authorize an 15advanced practice registered nurse with full practice 16authority to provide health care services required by law or 17rule to be performed by a physician. 18(Source: P.A. 102-75, eff. 1-1-22; 103-60, eff. 1-1-24.)